Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2133.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 5158HV (1) 91 as/js H.F. 2133 Section 1. Section 124.204, subsection 4, Code 2026, is 1 amended by adding the following new paragraph: 2 NEW PARAGRAPH . cq. Kratom, meaning any parts of the 3 plant Mitragyna speciosa, whether growing or not, as well as 4 synthetic equivalents of the substances contained in the plant, 5 and any compound, manufacture, salt, derivative, mixture, 6 or preparation of that plant, including but not limited to 7 mitragynine and 7-hydroxymitragynine. 8